Rhode Island statutes. Title 39 Public Utilities and Carriers
Chapter 19 Community Antenna Television Systems

39-19-1.
“Community antenna television system” defined.

“Community antenna television system” or “CATV” as used in this chapter shall mean and include the ownership or operation of a cable television system that receives video or audio signals, electrical impulses, or currents at a central antenna or electronic control center within this state and from which it distributes or transmits such signals, impulses, or currents by a cable or wire system to electronic equipment at a customer’s terminal point within this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 240, § 17; P.L. 2008, ch. 116, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 266, § 1.

39-19-2.
Subjection to regulation.

Every company owning or operating a CATV plant in this state is hereby declared to be a communications carrier and, as such, subject to the jurisdiction of and to reasonable rules and regulations as the division may prescribe with reference to the erection and maintenance of distribution facilities and equipment in, under, above, along, across, and upon public highways, bridges, and public places in order to safeguard the safety of the customers and of the public and to preserve the environment and scenic assets of the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 240, § 17.

39-19-3.
Certificate required.

No person or company shall operate a CATV service unless there shall be in force for the same a valid certificate issued by the administrator authorizing the operation. Every application for a certificate shall be filed with the administrator on a form provided by him or her and shall contain verified answers to such questions and such information as the administrator may propound or require and shall be accompanied by a fee of fifty dollars ($50.00). All certificates shall be nonexclusive. Any additional certificate issued shall not contain terms or conditions more favorable or less burdensome than those imposed on the incumbent company. The administrator, within a reasonable time, shall fix the time and place of hearing on the application.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 240, § 17; P.L. 1989, ch. 142, § 1.

39-19-4.
Persons entitled to certificate.

A certificate shall be issued by the administrator to an applicant therefor if the administrator finds that the applicant is of good character and is fit, willing, technically qualified, and financially able properly to perform the service proposed and to conform to the requirements, orders, rules, and regulations of the division, and that the proposed operation will be consistent with the public interest. No certificate shall be transferred except with the consent and approval of the administrator. The holder of a certificate shall be entitled to retain the same so long as the holder conforms to the orders, rules, and regulations of the division and pays an annual fee of fifty dollars ($50.00).

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 240, § 17.

39-19-5.
Contents of certificate.

Each certificate shall specify the service to be rendered, the routes of aerial and underground feeder and distribution cables, the area of operation, and any plans, contracts, or arrangements for pole line attachments with a public utility or arrangements with a common carrier, and other appropriate feasibility plans.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 240, § 17.

39-19-6.
Jurisdiction of division.

The division shall supervise and regulate every CATV company operating within this state so far as may be necessary to prevent the operation from having detrimental consequences to the public interest, and for this purpose may promulgate and enforce such reasonable rules and regulations as it may deem necessary with reference to issuance of certificates, territory of operation, abandonment of facilities, elimination of unjust discrimination among subscribers, financial responsibility, and insurance covering personal injury and property damage, safety of equipment and operation, and filing of reports. No certificates shall be issued or remain valid unless the applicant has filed with the division and revised to keep current a schedule of rates and charges for its services. The rates and charges shall be reasonably compensatory so as not to encourage unfair or destructive competitive practices and shall be applied without discrimination. The cable television section of the division of public utilities and carriers shall take all necessary steps to ensure that Rhode Island shall regulate the rates charged by cable television companies to the full extent allowable under federal law; provided, however, the division shall hold public hearings and the cable television companies shall justify and explain at the hearings the necessity for all rate increases of regulated rates. This section shall constitute authority to make any and all certifications to the Federal Communications Commission required under the Cable Television Consumer Protection and Competition Act of 1992, Pub. L. No. 102-385.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 240, § 17; P.L. 1993, ch. 46, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 188, § 1.

39-19-6.1.
Public, education and government television studios and equipment.

The division shall be empowered to manage and operate public, education, and government (PEG) access television in Rhode Island; provided, however, that an existing cable television certificate holder may, at its sole discretion, and for as long as it desires to do so, elect to continue to manage a PEG access studio within its service area.

In carrying out the purposes of this section, the division may designate another entity, whether public or private, to actually manage the day-to-day operations of any PEG access studios not being actively managed and operated by an existing cable television certificate holder. These day-to-day operations shall include the responsibility of programming statewide interconnect channels and managing interconnect playback in conjunction with the management of PEG playback.

The division shall fund the operations authorized under this section through PEG access and interconnect fees, which shall be established by the division following public hearing and notice to the state’s cable television certificate holders. The fees shall be paid by the state’s cable television certificate holders which may in turn pass through such expenses to their respective subscribers in accordance with federal law.

In furtherance of exercising this authority, the division shall promulgate such reasonable rules and regulations that the division deems necessary to carry out its responsibilities.

History of Section.

P.L. 2013, ch. 144, art. 7, § 6.

39-19-7.
Placing of poles and cables.

Every CATV company that receives a certificate from the administrator shall have the right to erect poles or posts or to construct any conduit or other facility or maintain cables, wires, or fixtures upon, under, or over any state or municipal highway or public place for the purpose of operating a CATV service, provided that a permit therefor has first been obtained from the director of transportation or the proper official of the city or town having jurisdiction over the roads or public places, which permission the officials are authorized to give.

All equipment, fixtures, and facilities shall be so placed or constructed as not to unreasonably inconvenience travel on the highway or use thereof by public utilities or other persons or companies having rights therein.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 240, § 17; P.L. 1970, ch. 206, § 1.

39-19-7.1.
Removal of poles and cables.

Whenever, in order to move a building to be used as affordable housing for low- and moderate-income persons for a period of not less than ten (10) years, a nonprofit housing development corporation desires that the poles, posts, conduits, cables, wires, or fixtures erected by a CATV company be cut, disconnected, or removed, the CATV company shall cut, disconnect, or remove the same at its own expense.

A nonprofit housing development corporation that desires the cutting, disconnection, or removal of poles, posts, conduits, cables, wires, or fixtures of a CATV company shall give written notification to the commission and the CATV company at least thirty (30) days before the removal is desired. The written notification must contain the location of the site where the structure is presently located; the location of the final destination of the structure; the path of the proposed move, described in reference to the crossings of streets or highways; and the date of required cutting, disconnection, or removal.

Upon receipt of the written notification described in §

39-2-15.1(b)

, the commission shall promptly determine whether the applicant is a nonprofit housing development corporation within the meaning of this chapter, and shall also determine whether the structure to be moved will be maintained as affordable housing for a period of not less than ten (10) years. A resolution, issued by the board of directors of the nonprofit housing development corporation and recorded at the land records office of the locality to where the structure is to be moved, stating that the structure will be used as affordable housing for a period of not less than ten (10) years, shall be satisfactory evidence that the requirements of this section have been satisfied. If the commission determines that the applicant satisfies the requirements of this section, it shall require that the CATV company undertake the actions as requested in the application on the date specified therein.

If, at any time during the ten-year (10) period following the cutting, disconnection, or removal of the pipes, mains, poles, wires, conduits, or fixtures of a public utility, the nonprofit housing development corporation shall utilize the structure for any purpose other than affordable housing, the nonprofit housing development corporation shall reimburse the public utility for the cost of the cutting, disconnection, or removal of the same.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 580, § 4.

39-19-8.
Revocation or change of certificate.

The commission may, after affording the holder an opportunity to be heard, revoke, suspend, or alter any certificate for willful violation of any provision of this chapter, or the rules and regulations or orders promulgated under the authority of this chapter, or for failure to commence operations within a reasonable time, or for other reasonable cause. If a holder of a certificate after commencing operations shall fail for a continuous period of sixty (60) days to render proper service without good reason therefor, the administrator shall revoke the certificate. In the exercise of the police power of the state, the commission may revoke or refuse to renew the license of any CATV company whose programs originating in this state have been adjudged by a court of competent jurisdiction to be obscene.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 240, § 17; P.L. 1983, ch. 314, § 1.

39-19-8.1.
Administrative civil penalties.

The administrator may, in his or her discretion, in lieu of seeking a suspension or revocation of a certificate as conferred under this chapter, impose upon its regulated CATV companies an administrative penalty. Any CATV company that violates any of the provisions of this chapter, or any division order, rule, or regulation issued or promulgated under this chapter, or does any act prohibited in this chapter, or fails or refuses to perform any duty enjoined upon it for which a penalty has not been provided, is subject to a penalty of not less than two hundred dollars ($200) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), and in the case of a continuing violation of any of the provisions of the chapter, every day’s continuance of a violation is a separate and distinct offense.

History of Section.

P.L. 2000, ch. 188, § 1.

39-19-9.
Administrative expenses — Assessment against franchise holders.

The administrator shall determine the expenses of the division of public utilities and carriers associated with the regulation of operational community antenna television systems, including the cost of division personnel and consultants performing duties directly associated with the systems for each upcoming year. The administrator shall apportion and assess one hundred percent (100%) of the expenses among the several operating CATV franchise holders located in this state in the proportion that the gross revenue of each CATV franchise shall bear to the gross revenues of all of the CATV franchises issued and operational; provided, however, that the sum so apportioned and assessed shall not exceed three percent (3%) of any individual CATV franchise holder’s gross revenues. The sum so apportioned and assessed shall be in addition to any taxes payable to the state under any other provision of law.

CATV franchise awardees that have received compliance-order certificates but have not received operational certificates shall be assessed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for any fiscal year in which they are franchised but not in operation.

The administrator shall apply any budgetary balance or shortfalls from the preceding annual assessment toward the next fiscal year assessment.

Upon collection from the several franchise holders operating in this state, assessments shall be deposited in the public utilities commission funding account as established pursuant to §

39-1-23

. The moneys deposited in the public utilities commission funding account pursuant to this section shall be expended at the discretion of the administrator for meeting CATV related operations expenses of the division.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 337, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 209, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 65, art. 42, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 44, art. 10, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 332, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 365, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 150, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 23, art. 12, § 1.

39-19-10.
Installation of cable television, telephone, telecommunications, or information service in multiple dwelling or commercial units.

Pursuant to the legislative intent that a tenant in a multiple dwelling unit shall have the freedom and right to select the provider of cable television, telephone, telecommunications, or information service to their living unit, without any restraints, limitations, or conditions imposed by a landlord, and to enable CATV operators or other telephone, telecommunications, or information service providers to offer meaningful choices to tenants of multiple dwelling or commercial units, a tenant in a multiple dwelling unit may subscribe to CATV, telephone, telecommunications, or information service, subject to the following provisions:

A CATV operator or other telephone, telecommunications, or information service provider that affixes or causes to be affixed CATV, telephone, telecommunications, or information facilities to the dwelling or commercial unit of a tenant shall (i) Do so at no cost to the landlord of the dwelling, (ii) Indemnify the landlord for damages, if any, arising from the installation and/or the continued operation thereof, and (iii) Not interfere with the safety, functioning, appearance, or use of the dwelling or commercial unit, nor interfere with the reasonable rules and regulations of the owner dealing with the day-to-day operations of the property, including the owner’s reasonable access rules for soliciting business. Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit a landlord from contracting with the CATV operator or other telephone, telecommunications, or information service provider for work in addition to standard installation.

No CATV operator or landlord shall enter into any agreement with persons owning, leasing, controlling, or managing a building served by a CATV system or perform any act that would directly or indirectly diminish or interfere with the rights of any tenant to use a master or individual antenna system.

A CATV operator or other telephone, telecommunications, or information service provider shall have the landlord’s consent to affix CATV system facilities that are necessary to either offer or provide service to a tenant’s dwelling or commercial unit by delivery to the owner, in person or by certified mail, return receipt requested, of a copy of this section and a signed statement that the CATV operator or other telephone, telecommunications, or information service provider will be bound by the terms of this section to the owner or lawful agent of the property upon which the CATV system facilities are to be affixed. A CATV operator or other telephone, telecommunications, or information service provider shall be permitted to affix CATV systems facilities pursuant to this subsection prior to receiving a request for service from a tenant.

The CATV operator or other service provider shall present and review with the owner prior to any installation, plans and specifications for the installation, and shall abide by reasonable installation requests by the owner. The CATV operator or other telephone, telecommunications, or information service provider will inspect the premises with the owner after installation to ensure conformance with the plans and specifications. The owner may waive, in writing, the prior presentation of the plans and specifications. The CATV operator or other telephone, telecommunications, or information service provider shall be responsible for the maintenance of any equipment installed on the owner’s premises and shall be entitled to reasonable access for maintenance. The CATV operator or other service provider shall also, prior to any installation, provide, upon the request of the owner, a certificate of insurance covering all the employees or agents of the installer, CATV operator, or other service provider as well as all equipment of the operator or other telephone, telecommunications, or information service provider.

If the owner of any such real estate intends to require the payment of any sum in excess of a nominal amount, herein defined as one dollar ($1.00), in exchange for permitting the installation of CATV, telephone, telecommunications, or information system facilities to the dwelling or commercial unit of a tenant, the owner shall notify the CATV operator or other service provider by certified mail, return receipt requested, within twenty (20) days of the date on which the owner is notified that the CATV operator or other telephone, telecommunications, or information service provider intends to extend CATV telephone, telecommunications, or information system facilities to the dwelling or commercial unit of a tenant of the owner’s real estate. Absent such notice, it will be conclusively presumed that the owner will not require payment in excess of the nominal amount specified in this subsection for the connection.

If the owner gives notice, the owner will, within thirty (30) days after giving notice, advise the CATV operator or other service provider in writing of the amount the owner claims as compensation for affixing CATV, telephone, telecommunications, or information system facilities to his or her real estate. If within thirty (30) days after receipt of the owner’s claim for compensation the CATV operator or other telephone, telecommunications, or information service provider has not agreed to accept the owner’s demand, the owner may bring an action in the superior court for the county in which the real estate is located to enforce the owner’s claim for compensation. The action shall be brought within six (6) months of the date on which the owner first made a demand upon the CATV operator or other telephone, telecommunications, or information service provider for compensation and not thereafter.

It shall be presumed that reasonable compensation therefor shall be the nominal amount, but the presumption may be rebutted and overcome by evidence that the owner has a specific alternative use for the space occupied by CATV or other telephone, telecommunications, or information system facilities or equipment, the loss of which shall result in a monetary loss to the owner, or that installation of CATV or other telephone, telecommunications, or information system facilities or equipment upon the multiple dwelling or commercial unit will otherwise substantially interfere with the use and occupancy of the unit to an extent that causes a decrease in the resale or rental value of the real estate. In determining the damages to any real estate injured when no part of it is being taken, consideration is to be given only to such injury as is special and peculiar to the real estate, and there shall be deducted therefrom the amount of any benefit to the real estate by reason of the installation of CATV, telephone, telecommunications, or information system facilities.

None of the foregoing steps to claim or enforce a demand for compensation in excess of the nominal amount shall impair or delay the right of the CATV operator, or other service provider to install, maintain, or remove CATV system facilities to a tenant’s dwelling or commercial unit on the real estate. The superior court shall have original jurisdiction to enforce the provisions of this subsection.

In the event that the superior court determines that any individual or entity has unreasonably interfered with the rights granted to tenants, CATV operators, or other service providers as set forth in this subsection, the superior court may award the party seeking enforcement its reasonable attorney’s fees and costs.

Nothing contained herein shall impair the right of a tenant of a multiple dwelling unit or a CATV operator, or other telephone, telecommunications, or information service provider to pursue any other remedies that may be available at law or in equity.

It shall be an unfair trade practice under chapter 13.1 of title 6 for any person owning, leasing, or managing any multiple dwelling unit served by a CATV system or other telephone, telecommunications, or information service provider to discriminate in rental charges or other charges to tenants based on the tenants’ subscription to a CATV, telephone, telecommunications, or information service from and after June 25, 1986, or to demand or accept payment, except as provided in this section, for the affixing of CATV, telephone, telecommunications, or information facilities to a tenant’s dwelling or commercial unit; provided, however, that this subsection shall not apply to contracts entered into on or before June 25, 1986.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 257, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 222, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 116, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 266, § 1.

39-19-10.1.
Installation of cable television in mobile or manufactured home parks.

A tenant in a mobile or manufactured home park may subscribe to CATV service, subject to the following provisions:

A CATV operator that affixes, or causes to be affixed, CATV facilities to the dwelling of a tenant shall (i) Do so at no cost to the landlord of such mobile or manufactured home park, (ii) Indemnify the landlord for damages, if any, arising from the installation and/or the continued operation thereof, and (iii) Not interfere with the safety, functioning, appearance, or use of the mobile or manufactured home park, nor interfere with the reasonable rules and regulations of the owner dealing with the day-to-day operations of the property, including the owner’s reasonable access rules for soliciting business. Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit a landlord from contracting with the CATV operator for work in addition to standard installation.

No CATV operator shall enter into any agreement with persons owning, leasing, controlling, or managing a mobile or manufactured home park served by a CATV system or perform any act that would directly or indirectly diminish or interfere with the rights of any tenant to use a master or individual antenna system.

A CATV operator shall have the landlord’s consent to affix CATV system facilities that are necessary to either offer or provide service to a privately owned utility pole within the mobile or manufactured home park by delivery to the owner, in person or by certified mail, return receipt requested, of a copy of this section and a signed statement that the CATV operator will be bound by the terms of this section to the owner or lawful agent of the property upon which the CATV system facilities are to be affixed. A CATV operator or other telephone, telecommunications, or information service provider shall be permitted to affix CATV systems facilities pursuant to this subsection prior to receiving a request for service from a tenant.

The CATV operator shall present and review with the owner prior to any installation, plans and specifications for the installation, and shall abide by reasonable installation requests by the owner. The CATV operator will inspect the premises with the owner after installation to ensure conformance with the plans and specifications. The owner may waive in writing the prior presentation of the plans and specifications. The CATV operator shall be responsible for the maintenance of any equipment installed on the owner’s premises and shall be entitled to reasonable access for maintenance. The CATV operator shall also, prior to any installation, provide, upon the request of the owner, a certificate of insurance covering all the employees or agents of the installer or CATV operator as well as all equipment of the operator.

If the owner of any privately owned utility pole intends to require the payment of any sum in excess of a nominal amount, herein defined as the amount paid by the CATV operator to utility companies for installation of similar facilities on their poles, in exchange for permitting the installation of CATV system facilities to the privately owned utility pole, the owner shall notify the CATV operator by certified mail, return receipt requested, within twenty (20) days of the date on which the owner is notified that the CATV operator intends to install CATV system facilities on the privately owned utility pole within the mobile or manufactured home park. Absent such notice, it will be conclusively presumed that the owner will not require payment in excess of the nominal amount specified in this subsection for the connection.

If the owner gives notice, the owner will, within thirty (30) days after giving notice, advise the CATV operator in writing of the amount the owner claims as compensation for affixing CATV system facilities to his or her privately owned utility pole. If within thirty (30) days after receipt of the owner’s claim for compensation, the CATV operator has not agreed to accept the owner’s demand, the owner may bring an action in the superior court for the county in which the real estate is located to enforce the owner’s claim for compensation. The action shall be brought within six (6) months of the date on which the owner first made a demand upon the CATV operator for compensation and not thereafter.

It shall be presumed that reasonable compensation therefor shall be the nominal amount, but the presumption may be rebutted and overcome by evidence that the owner has a specific alternative use for the space occupied by CATV system facilities or equipment, the loss of which shall result in a monetary loss to the owner, or that installation of CATV system facilities or equipment upon the privately owned utility pole will otherwise substantially interfere with the use and occupancy of the pole to an extent that causes a decrease in the resale or rental value of the real estate. In determining the damages to any real estate injured when no part of it is being taken, consideration is to be given only to such injury as is special and peculiar to the real estate, and there shall be deducted therefrom the amount of any benefit to the real estate by reason of the installation of CATV system facilities.

None of the foregoing steps to claim or enforce a demand for compensation in excess of the nominal amount shall impair or delay the right of the CATV operator to install, maintain, or remove CATV system facilities to a tenant’s dwelling on the real estate. The superior court shall have original jurisdiction to enforce the provisions of this subsection.

In the event that the superior court determines that any individual or entity has unreasonably interfered with the rights granted to tenants, CATV operators, or other service providers as set forth in this subsection, the superior court may award the party seeking enforcement its reasonable attorney’s fees and costs.

Nothing contained herein shall impair the right of a tenant or a CATV operator or other telephone, telecommunications, or information service provider to pursue any other remedies that may be available at law or in equity.

It shall be an unfair trade practice under chapter 13.1 of title 6 for any person owning, leasing, or managing any mobile or manufactured home park served by a CATV system to discriminate in rental charges or other charges to tenants based on the tenants’ subscription to a CATV service from and after July 1, 1987, or to demand or accept payment, except as provided in this section, for the affixing of CATV facilities to a privately owned utility pole within the mobile or manufactured home park provided, however, that this subsection shall not apply to contracts entered into on or before July 1, 1987.

For the purposes of this section, the phrase “privately owned utility pole” refers to a utility pole that is owned by a person or entity other than a public utility or municipal corporation providing electric or telecommunications services.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 239, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 116, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 266, § 1.

39-19-11.
Right of cancellation.

Subscribers to cable television may terminate service at any time by requesting disconnection and returning all equipment to the CATV company.

History of Section.

P.L. 1986, ch. 257, § 1.

39-19-12.
Billing to subscribers.

The cable television section of the division of public utilities and carriers shall conduct a study of the billing and termination practices of cable television companies throughout the New England region. This study shall focus on the practice of advance billing by cable television companies and positive or negative effects on subscribers associated with prohibiting the practice. The study shall also include the financial impact of a prohibition of advanced billing on cable television companies and their subscribers including any technical barriers to prohibiting advance billing. The division shall submit a report to the house corporations committee on or before October 30, 1993. All costs associated with this study shall be billed directly to cable television companies pursuant to §

39-19-9

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 46, § 2.

39-19-13.
Payment for services — Late charges.

No subscriber to a cable television service shall be subject to an assessment of a late fee on a monthly billing unless the payment is at least forty-five (45) days past the close of the billing period that is the subject of the statement. A cable television operator shall not impose a late fee unless the bill contains a clear and conspicuous notice of when the late fee is to be imposed consistent with this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 46, § 2.

39-19-14.
Recovery of expenses from cable television companies.

The cable television company making an application or filing to the division, or subject to a division investigation, shall be charged with and shall pay the expenses reasonably so incurred by the division for the purchase of materials, and for the employment of legal counsel, official stenographers, engineers, accountants, and expert witnesses and for travel, advertising expense, hearing site expense, and other necessary expenses as are reasonably attributable to the investigation or the hearing of the application or filing by the division.

The total amount that may be charged to any cable television company under authority of this section for proceedings before the division in any calendar year shall not exceed forty thousand dollars ($40,000).

The administrator shall ascertain the expenses and shall determine the amount to be paid by the cable television company or companies, and bills shall be rendered therefor, either at the conclusion of the investigation or hearing, or from time to time during its progress, and the amount of each bill so rendered shall be paid by the cable television company to the administrator within thirty (30) days from the date of its rendition unless, within the thirty-day (30) time period, the cable television company so billed shall request an opportunity to be heard by the division as to the amount thereof. The division shall comply with any such request. Any amount of the bill not paid within thirty (30) days from the date of service of the determination upon the hearing, or, if none shall be requested, within thirty (30) days from the date of rendition of the bill, shall draw interest at the rate of twelve percent (12%) per annum. At the discretion of the administrator, cable television companies may be prebilled for contractual services utilized by the division. Any revenue received, but not expended upon the completion of the case, will be promptly reimbursed to the cable television company.

Any person or company making an application to the division for the issuance of a CATV certificate shall be charged with and pay all expenses reasonably incurred by the division in supplying materials and for the employment of legal counsel, official stenographers, engineers, accountants, and expert witnesses, and for travel and other necessary expenses as are reasonably attributable to the investigation or the hearing of the application proposal. Applicants shall pay those fees in full prior to the hearing process commencing unless the administrator agrees to an alternate payment schedule. All fees collected by the division shall be deposited with the general treasurer and appropriated to the division. The administrator is authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for payment of any sum or sums as may be necessary, from time to time, and upon receipt by him or her of authenticated vouchers presented by the administrator. Failure of the applicant to pay expenses lawfully assessed by the administrator shall constitute grounds for suspension of regulatory proceedings or revocation of any certificate granted, until the applicant has paid the expenses.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 329, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 28, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 67, § 1.